Connecticut, session 2026, HB05315.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to banking shall convene a working group to study
consumer fraud and protections against such fraud.
(b) The working group shall include, but need not be limited to, the
following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to banking, or their designees;
(2) The Banking Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee;
(3) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
or the commissioner's designee;
(4) The executive director of the Commission on Women, Children,
Seniors, Equity and Opportunity, or the executive director's designee;
(5) An elder law attorney who represents senior citizens in the state;
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5315
(6) A representative of an association that represents financial
institutions in the state;
(7) A representative of an organization that represents credit unions
in the state;
(8) A representative of an organization that represents consumers in
the state;
(9) A representative of an organization that represents senior citizens
in the state;
(10) Three members of an association that represents financial
institutions in the state, who shall be appointed by such association; and
(11) Three members of an organization that represents credit unions
in the state, who shall be appointed by such organization.
(c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking shall:
(1) Appoint the members described in subdivisions (5) to (9),
inclusive, of subsection (b) of this section;
(2) Select the association and organization described in subdivisions
(10) and (11) of subsection (b) of this section, respectively, for the
purpose of making the appointments described in said subdivisions;
and
(3) Schedule the first meeting of the working group, which shall be
held not later than sixty days after the effective date of this section.
(d) The members of the working group shall select two
cochairpersons from among the members of the working group.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to banking
shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5315
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to banking, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
of the general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date
that it submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
BA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3